Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,126
Sale of assets other than in regular course of activities.

(a) A corporation may sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its property (with or without the goodwill) other than in the usual and regular course of its activities on the terms and conditions and for the consideration determined by the corporation's board if the proposed transaction is authorized by subsection (b) of this section.

(b) Unless the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, the articles, or bylaws or the board of directors or members (acting pursuant to subsection (d) of this section) require a greater vote or voting by class, the proposed transaction to be authorized must be approved:

(1) By the board;

(2) By the members by two-thirds of the votes cast or a majority of the voting power, whichever is less; and

(3) In writing by any person or persons whose approval is required by a provision of the articles authorized by section 21-19,116 for an amendment to the articles or bylaws.

(c) If the corporation does not have members the transaction must be approved by a vote of a majority of the directors in office at the time the transaction is approved. In addition the corporation shall provide notice of any directors' meeting at which such approval is to be obtained in accordance with subsection (c) of section 21-1982. The notice must also state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all or substantially all of the property or assets of the corporation and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of a description of the transaction.

(d) The board may condition its submission of the proposed transaction and the members may condition their approval of the transaction on receipt of a higher percentage of affirmative votes or on any other basis.

(e) If the corporation seeks to have the transaction approved by the members at a membership meeting, the corporation shall give notice to its members of the proposed membership meeting in accordance with section 21-1955. The notice must also state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all or substantially all of the property or assets of the corporation and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of a description of the transaction.

(f) If the board needs to have the transaction approved by the members by written consent or written ballot, the material soliciting the approval shall contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of a description of the transaction.

(g) A public benefit or religious corporation must give written notice to the Attorney General twenty days before it sells, leases, exchanges, or otherwise disposes of all or substantially all of its property if the transaction is not in the usual and regular course of its activities unless the Attorney General has given the corporation a written waiver of this subsection.

(h) After a sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of property is authorized, the transaction may be abandoned (subject to any contractual rights) without further action by the members or any other person who approved the transaction in accordance with the procedure set forth in the resolution proposing the transaction or, if none is set forth, in the manner determined by the board of directors.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 126.